West Virginia, session 2026, HB5576.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Socially Necessary Services (SNS) provider mileage reporting. (a) The Department of Human Services shall implement the following to improve accountability and modernize billing and payment processes:(1) Establish a tiered reporting system that requires:(A) Detailed mileage summary logs for agency providers that report mileage over 3,000 miles in a 92-day authorization period;(B) Necessary documentation to verify services for agency providers to report mileage under 3,000 miles in a 92-day authorization period;(C) Update reporting documentation processes to remove redundancy; and(D) Utilize user-friendly digital reporting forms to reduce clerical errors, and incentivize the use of GRS-integrated mileage tracking software for provider agencies.(2) GPS software shall suffice for the detailed summary logs required in (a)(1).(3) The cost associated with the procurement of such technology shall be on the provider agency.(4) A provider agency utilizing such technology shall be granted expedited payment status.